New York, session 2025-2026, S10364.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 816-a 2 to read as follows: 3 § 816-a. Scouting America and Girl Scouts of the USA recruitment. An 4 appropriate administrator, including, but not limited to, the school 5 principal or superintendent, of any public school may allow an official 6 member or members of Scouting America and Girl Scouts of the USA, upon 7 request, to enter the school for the purpose of Scouting America and 8 Girl Scouts of the USA recruitment, including, but not limited to: 9 making presentations; disseminating literature; participating in school 10 events; and answering questions by students. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15858-02-6